Utah statutes.
67-3-5.   Right of visitation and examination.

For the purpose of carrying out the duties of the state auditor, the state auditor shall have access to all offices of public entities during business hours for the inspection of their records, regardless of any general limitation on access to records provided in an entity's individual statute.



Amended by Chapter 78, 2003 General Session

